fr: Type de système hydraulique d’embrayage: Embrayage hydraulique (CSC concentrique); Embrayage hydraulique (récepteur externe); Embrayage hydraulique (standard); Application de conversion hydraulique; Autre
es: Tipo de sistema hidráulico del embrague: Embrague hidráulico (CSC concéntrico); Embrague hidráulico (esclavo externo); Embrague hidráulico (estándar); Aplicación de conversión hidráulica; Otro
nl: Koppeling hydraulisch systeemtype: Hydraulische koppeling (concentrisch, CSC); Hydraulische koppeling (externe hulpcilinder); Hydraulische koppeling (standaard); Hydraulische conversietoepassing; Overig
vi: Loại hệ thống thủy lực ly hợp: Ly hợp thủy lực (CSC đồng tâm); Ly hợp thủy lực (xi lanh con ngoài); Ly hợp thủy lực (tiêu chuẩn); Bộ chuyển đổi thủy lực; Khác
sk-SK: Typ hydraulického systému spojky: Hydraulická spojka (koncentrická CSC); Hydraulická spojka (externý valec); Hydraulická spojka (štandardná); Súprava na hydraulickú prestavbu; Iné
fi: Kytkimen hydrauliikkajärjestelmän tyyppi: Hydraulinen kytkin (keskitetty CSC); Hydraulinen kytkin (ulkoinen työsylinteri); Hydraulinen kytkin (vakio); Hydraulinen muutossarja; Muu
bg-BG: Тип хидравлична система на съединителя: Хидравличен съединител (концентричен CSC); Хидравличен съединител (външен цилиндър); Хидравличен съединител (стандартен); Комплект за хидравлично преобразуване; Други
pl: Typ hydraulicznego układu sprzęgła: Sprzęgło hydrauliczne (z centralnym wysprzęglikiem CSC); Sprzęgło hydrauliczne (z wysprzęglikiem zewnętrznym); Sprzęgło hydrauliczne (standardowe); Zestaw do konwersji na sprzęgło hydrauliczne; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta hidravličnega sistema sklopke: Hidravlična sklopka (koncentrična CSC); Hidravlična sklopka (zunanji delovni valj); Hidravlična sklopka (standardna); Uporaba za hidravlično predelavo; Drugo
ru: Тип гидравлической системы сцепления: Гидравлическое сцепление (концентрический рабочий цилиндр); Гидравлическое сцепление (внешний рабочий цилиндр); Гидравлическое сцепление (стандартное); Комплект для перехода на гидравлику; Другое
it: Tipo di sistema idraulico della frizione: Frizione idraulica (CSC concentrico); Frizione idraulica (cilindro secondario esterno); Frizione idraulica (standard); Applicazione conversione idraulica; Altro
hu: Kuplung hidraulikus rendszerének típusa: Hidraulikus tengelykapcsoló (koncentrikus CSC); Hidraulikus tengelykapcsoló (külső munkahenger); Hidraulikus tengelykapcsoló (normál); Hidraulikus átalakító készlet; Egyéb
zh-TW: 離合器液壓系統類型: 液壓離合器 (同心釋放軸承 CSC); 液壓離合器 (外置分泵); 液壓離合器 (標準); 液壓改裝應用; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul sistemului hidraulic al ambreiajului: Ambreiaj hidraulic (concentric CSC); Ambreiaj hidraulic (cilindru receptor extern); Ambreiaj hidraulic (standard); Aplicație de conversie hidraulică; Altele
th: ประเภทระบบไฮดรอลิกคลัตช์: คลัตช์ไฮดรอลิก (CSC แบบร่วมศูนย์); คลัตช์ไฮดรอลิก (กระบอกสูบภายนอก); คลัตช์ไฮดรอลิก (มาตรฐาน); ชุดแปลงระบบไฮดรอลิก; อื่นๆ
ko: 클러치 유압 시스템 유형: 유압 클러치(동심원 CSC); 유압 클러치(외부 슬레이브); 유압 클러치(표준); 유압 변환 애플리케이션; 기타
zh-CN: 离合器液压系统类型: 液压离合器（同心 CSC）; 液压离合器（外部从动缸）; 液压离合器（标准）; 液压改装应用; 其他
en: Clutch hydraulic system type: Hydraulic clutch (concentric CSC); Hydraulic clutch (external slave); Hydraulic clutch (standard); Hydraulic conversion application; Other
sv: Kopplingens hydraulsystemtyp: Hydraulisk koppling (koncentrisk CSC); Hydraulisk koppling (extern slavcylinder); Hydraulisk koppling (standard); Applikation för hydraulisk konvertering; Övrigt
tr: Debriyaj hidrolik sistemi türü: Hidrolik debriyaj (eş merkezli CSC); Hidrolik debriyaj (harici alt merkez); Hidrolik debriyaj (standart); Hidrolik dönüşüm uygulaması; Diğer
el: Τύπος υδραυλικού συστήματος συμπλέκτη: Υδραυλικός συμπλέκτης (ομόκεντρος CSC); Υδραυλικός συμπλέκτης (εξωτερικός βοηθητικός κύλινδρος); Υδραυλικός συμπλέκτης (τυπικός); Εφαρμογή υδραυλικής μετατροπής; Άλλο
nb: Hydraulisk clutchsystemtype: Hydraulisk clutch (konsentrisk CSC); Hydraulisk clutch (ekstern slave); Hydraulisk clutch (standard); Applikasjon for hydraulisk konvertering; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema hidráulico de embraiagem: Embraiagem hidráulica (CSC concêntrico); Embraiagem hidráulica (secundário externo); Embraiagem hidráulica (padrão); Aplicação de conversão hidráulica; Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de sistema hidráulico de embreagem: Embreagem hidráulica (cilindro concêntrico/CSC); Embreagem hidráulica (cilindro escravo externo); Embreagem hidráulica (padrão); Aplicação de conversão hidráulica; Outros
cs: Typ hydraulického systému spojky: Hydraulická spojka (koncentrická CSC); Hydraulická spojka (externí pracovní válec); Hydraulická spojka (standardní); Sada pro konverzi na hydrauliku; Jiný
hr-HR: Vrsta hidrauličkog sustava spojke: Hidraulična spojka (koncentrični CSC); Hidraulična spojka (vanjski radni cilindar); Hidraulična spojka (standardna); Sustav za hidrauličnu konverziju; Ostalo
de: Typ des Kupplungshydrauliksystems: Hydraulische Kupplung (Zentralausrücker CSC); Hydraulische Kupplung (externer Nehmerzylinder); Hydraulische Kupplung (Standard); Hydraulikumbau-Anwendung; Andere
da: Type af hydraulisk koblingssystem: Hydraulisk kobling (koncentrisk CSC); Hydraulisk kobling (ekstern slavecylinder); Hydraulisk kobling (standard); Hydraulisk konverteringsapplikation; Andet
lt-LT: Sankabos hidraulinės sistemos tipas: Hidraulinė sankaba (koncentrinis CSC); Hidraulinė sankaba (išorinis darbinis cilindras); Hidraulinė sankaba (standartinė); Hidraulinės konversijos pritaikymas; Kita
ja: クラッチ油圧システムタイプ: 油圧クラッチ (同軸CSC); 油圧クラッチ (外部スレーブ); 油圧クラッチ (スタンダード); 油圧コンバージョン用; その他